src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-cmp_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst

Tests:
  
  Noun - cmp: #  
    laahâ+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#almai+N+Sg+Nom:  lahâalmai     #2KIEHA
    aajâ+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#robdâ+N+Sg+Nom:  ajârobdâ     #S_AAIGA
    káátu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#čuovâ+N+Sg+Nom:  kátučuovâ     #2LAAVU
    máánu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ase+N+Sg+Nom:  mánuase     #2MAANU
    táálu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#almai+N+Sg+Nom:  tálualmai     #2LAAVU 2TAALU2
    máátu+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#saje+N+Sg+Nom:  mátusaje     #2LAAVU 2TAALU2
    meerâ+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#kyeli+N+Sg+Nom:  merâkyeli     #2KIELA
    sääni+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#taaiđâ+N+Sg+Nom:  sänitaaiđâ     #2SAAMI 2KYELI
    keesi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#pieggâ+N+Sg+Nom:  kesipieggâ     #2SAAMI
    kähvi+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#pánnu+N+Sg+Nom:  kähvipánnu     #2SAAMI
    eeči+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#peeli+N+Sg+Nom:  ečipeeli     #2CAACI
    eeti+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#čuávdus+N+Sg+Nom:  etičuávdus     #2KYELI
    kyeli+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#šlaajâ+N+Sg+Nom:  kyelišlaajâ     #2KYELI
    meeri+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#äigi+N+Sg+Nom:  meriäigi     #2KYELI
    määli+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#pastem+N+Sg+Nom:  mälipastem     #2KYELI
    teejâ+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#pastem+N+Sg+Nom:  tejâpastem     #2KIELA
    käärbis+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ruátu+N+Sg+Nom:  kärbisruátu     #C_KAARBIS
    njäälgis+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#sekkâ+N+Sg+Nom:  njälgissekkâ     #C_KAARBIS
    päälgis+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#keđgi+N+Pl+Nom:  pälgiskeeđgih    #C_KAARBIS
    čyegis+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#puustav+N+Pl+Nom:  čyegispustaveh     #C_KAARBIS

    määlis+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#pastem+N+Sg+Nom:  mälispastem     #3PAAVIR
    käädis+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ergi+N+Sg+Nom:  kädisergi     #3VEESKIR
    kiintâl+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#vuojâ+N+Sg+Nom:  kintâlvuojâ     #3VEESKIR
    uástus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#listo+N+Sg+Nom:  uástuslisto     #3VEESKIR
    
    čuudâ+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#räigi+N+Sg+Nom:  čudâräigi     #S_AAIGA
    tieđâ+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#syergi+N+Sg+Nom:  tieđâsyergi     #S_AAIGA
    
    läddi+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#almai+N+Sg+Nom:  lädialmai     #2AIGI
